Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Until June 30, 2026, the commissioner of the Kentucky Department
of Education, the Kentucky Board of Education, and the Kentucky Department of
Education shall not establish or implement, or require a school district to implement, any
cap, limitation, or restriction on enrollment for a virtual program. Additionally, the
Kentucky Department of Education and the Kentucky Board of Education shall not
reduce or withhold any funds due to a school district from the fund to Support Education
Excellence in Kentucky based on the district's operation of a virtual program.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 3:51 PM Jacketed